Louisiana, session 2026, HB1036.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1483(26) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1483. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings given
to each in this Section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(26) "Primary purpose" means the purpose of making contributions or
expenditures that constitute the preponderance more than fifty percent of the
association, political party, an entity's or group's spending during a calendar year.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.